Washington statutes.
RCW 19.178.120

Violation—False or incorrect notice—Penalty.

A person who knowingly violates this chapter or who knowingly gives false or incorrect information in a notice required by this chapter is guilty of a gross misdemeanor punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

[ 1993 c 456 s 13.]